Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3509
Criminal justice agency, defined.

Criminal justice agency shall mean:

(1) Courts; and

(2) A government agency or any subunit thereof which performs the administration of criminal justice pursuant to a statute or executive order and which allocates a substantial part of its annual budget to the administration of criminal justice.

Laws 1978, LB 713, § 9.